Maryland, session 2025, SB0559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Department of Transportation shall conduct a study on the implications
of speed limit changes on highways in the State that connect to I–495.
(b) The study shall:
(1) identify the highways in the State that connect to I–495;
(2) identify the speed limits on the highways in the State that connect to
I–495;
(3) analyze the traffic congestion over the past 5 years at locations where
highways in the State connect to I–495;
(4) analyze the prevalence of speeding tickets over the past 5 years at
locations where highways in the State connect to I–495;
(5) analyze the prevalence of accidents over the past 5 years at locations
where highways in the State connect to I–495;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0559*

SENATE BILL 559
(6) analyze other hazards and incidents over the past 5 years at locations
where highways in the State connect to I–495;
(7) analyze existing speed limits on the highways in the State that connect
to I–495;
(8) analyze the feasibility of requiring the speed limit to deviate by only 5
miles per hour at locations where a highway in the State connects to I–495; and
(9) if feasible, recommend measures for requiring the speed limit to deviate
by only 5 miles per hour at locations where a highway in the State connects to I–495.
(c) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Department shall consult with local officials and stakeholders that have expertise and
familiarity with traffic safety issues faced by drivers who use highways in the State that
connect to I–495.
(d) On or before December 31, 2025, the Department shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.